Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Part 1

— Receipts From Entities

28-70-401. Character of receipts.

In this section, “entity” means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, regulated investment company, real estate investment trust, common trust fund, or any other organization in which a trustee has an interest other than a trust or estate to which §28-70-402 applies, a business or activity to which §28-70-403 applies, or an asset-backed security to which §28-70-415 applies.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a trustee shall allocate to income money received from an entity.

A trustee shall allocate the following receipts from an entity to principal:

property other than money;

money received in one distribution or a series of related distributions in exchange for part or all of a trust's interest in the entity;

money received in total or partial liquidation of the entity; and

Money is received in partial liquidation:

to the extent that the entity, at or near the time of a distribution, indicates that it is a distribution in partial liquidation; or

if the total amount of money and property received in a distribution or series of related distributions is greater than 20 percent of the entity's gross assets, as shown by the entity's year-end financial statements immediately preceding the initial receipt.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 401.

28-70-402. Distribution from trust or estate.

A trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as a distribution of income from a trust or an estate in which the trust has an interest other than a purchased interest and shall allocate to principal an amount received as a distribution of principal from such a trust or estate. If a trustee purchases an interest in a trust that is an investment entity, or a decedent or donor transfers an interest in such a trust to a trustee, §28-70-401 or §28-70-415 applies to a receipt from the trust.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 402.

28-70-403. Business and other activities conducted by trustee.

If a trustee who conducts a business or other activity determines that it is in the best interest of all the beneficiaries to account separately for the business or activity instead of accounting for it as part of the trust's general accounting records, the trustee may maintain separate accounting records for its transactions, whether or not its assets are segregated from other trust assets.

A trustee who accounts separately for a business or other activity may determine the extent to which its net cash receipts must be retained for working capital, the acquisition or replacement of fixed assets, and other reasonably foreseeable needs of the business or activity, and the extent to which the remaining net cash receipts are accounted for as principal or income in the trust's general accounting records. If a trustee sells assets of the business or other activity, other than in the ordinary course of the business or activity, the trustee shall account for the net amount received as principal in the trust's general accounting records to the extent the trustee determines that the amount received is no longer required in the conduct of the business.

Activities for which a trustee may maintain separate accounting records include:

retail, manufacturing, service, and other traditional business activities;

farming;

raising and selling livestock and other animals;

management of rental properties;

extraction of minerals and other natural resources;

timber operations; and

activities to which § 28-70-414 applies.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 647, § 403.